apertium-es-ast.es.dix
  <pardef n="abar/car__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>caríamos</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>caría</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>caríais</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>carías</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>carían</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>caría</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>caremos</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>caré</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>caréis</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>carás</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>carán</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cará</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cáremos</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>care</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>careis</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cares</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>caren</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>care</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="fts"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cando</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cándo</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabiéndo"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>camos</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>qué</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>casteis</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>caste</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>caron</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>có</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cad</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ca</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
      <p>
        <l>os</l>
        <r>os<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cad</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabed"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cá</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabé"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cád</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabéd"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ca</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>car</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>car</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__saber"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cár</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r>
      </p>
<par n="S__sabér"/>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cábamos</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>caba</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cabais</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cabas</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>caban</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>caba</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cáramos</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>cásemos</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cara</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>case</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>carais</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>caseis</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>caras</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>cases</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>caran</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>casen</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cara</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>case</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cadas</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cada</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cados</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cado</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>cado</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>camos</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>co</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cáis</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>cas</l>
        <r>car<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>

<e><i>abani</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>abarran</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>abdi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>acer</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>achi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>acidifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>adjudi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>afin</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>ahor</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>apla</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>arran</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>atas</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>bifur</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>bus</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>califi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>cho</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>cualifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>compli</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>contraata</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>criti</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>desatas</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>desembo</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>desmar</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>diversifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>edifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>electrifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>enfras</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>equivo</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>evo</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>fabri</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>hin</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>impli</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>indi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>intoxi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>justifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>mar</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>multipli</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>pe</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>pi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>pontifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>predi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>pronosti</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>publi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>ras</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>rectifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>reivindi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>remol</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>reto</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>revo</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>sacrifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>salpi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>signifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>sofisti</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>supli</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>trasto</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>trun</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>verifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR"><i>ahue</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>amplifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>cas</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>chamus</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>despotri</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>domesti</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>embro</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>enclue</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>enfos</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>entresa</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>esta</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>hoci</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>masti</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>peñiz</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>plati</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>rebus</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>ron</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>trompi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>dislo</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>ratifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>dise</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>imbri</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>ramifi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>quintupli</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>repes</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>tru</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>acha</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>estan</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
<e><i>ubi</i><par n="abar/car__vblex"/></e>
